North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2. Work First Program.
§ 108A-31.
Application for assistance.

Any person who believes that the person is eligible to receive Work First Program assistance may apply for assistance to the county department of social services in the county in which the person resides, or, in the case of residents of Electing Counties, to the public or private entity designated by the board of county commissioners. Counties shall record inquiries for and accept applications from all persons requesting to apply for Work First Program assistance. Counties shall process applications in a reasonable and timely manner.

History.

1937, c. 288, ss. 15, 45; 1939, c. 395, s. 1; 1941, c. 232; 1945, c. 615, s. 1; 1947, c. 91, s. 3; 1953, c. 675, s. 12; 1959, c. 179, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 742; 1979, c. 702, s. 4; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.8A.

§§ 108A-32 through 108A-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 12.14.

§ 108A-36.
Assistance not assignable; checks payable to decedents.

The assistance granted by this Article shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity; and none of the money paid or payable as assistance shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal processes, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

In the event of the death of a public assistance recipient during or after the first day of the month for which assistance was previously authorized by the county social services board, or county director if waived, any public assistance check or checks payable to such recipient not endorsed prior to such recipient’s death shall be delivered to the clerk of superior court and by him administered under the provisions of

G.S. 28A-25-6

.

History.

1937, c. 288, ss. 17, 47; 1945, c. 615, s. 1; 1953, c. 213; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 446, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 655, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article analyzing North Carolina’s exemptions law, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1025 (1982).

§ 108A-37.
Personal representative for mismanaged public assistance.

Whenever a county director of social services shall determine that a recipient of assistance is unwilling or unable to manage such assistance to the extent that deprivation or hazard to himself or others results, the director shall file a petition before a district court or the clerk of superior court in the county alleging such facts and requesting the appointment of a personal representative to be responsible for receiving such assistance and to use it for the benefit of the recipient.

Upon receipt of such petition, the court shall promptly hold a hearing, provided the recipient shall receive five days’ notice in writing of the time and place of such hearing. If the court, sitting without a jury, shall find at the hearing that the facts alleged in the petition are true, it may appoint some responsible person as personal representative. The personal representative shall serve without compensation and be responsible to the court for the faithful performance of his duties. He shall serve until the director of social services or the recipient shows to the court that the personal representative is no longer required or is unsuitable. All costs of court relating to proceedings under this section shall be waived.

Any recipient for whom a personal representative is appointed may appeal such appointment to superior court for a hearing de novo without a jury.

All findings of fact made under the proceedings authorized by this section shall not be competent as evidence in any case or proceeding which concerns any subject matter other than that of appointing a personal representative.

History.

1959, c. 1239, ss. 1, 3; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-38.
Protective and vendor payments.

When necessary to comply with any present or future federal law or regulation in order to obtain federal participation in public assistance payments, the payments may be made direct to vendors to reimburse them for goods and services provided the applicants or recipients, and may be made to protective payees who shall act for the applicant or recipient for receiving and managing assistance. Payments to vendors and protective payees shall be made to the extent provided in, and in accordance with, rules
of the Social Services Commission or the Department, which rules shall be subject to applicable federal laws and regulations.

History.

1963, c. 380; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; c. 747; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 20; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.9.

§ 108A-39.
Fraudulent misrepresentation.

Any person whether provider or recipient, or person representing himself as such, who willfully and knowingly and with intent to deceive makes a false statement or representation or who fails to disclose a material fact and as a result of making a false statement or representation or failing to disclose a material fact obtains, for himself or another person, attempts to obtain for himself or another person, or continues to receive or enables another person to continue to receive public assistance in the amount of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person, whether provider or recipient, or person representing himself as such who willfully and knowingly with the intent to deceive makes a false statement or representation or fails to disclose a material fact and as a result of making a false statement or representation or failing to disclose a material fact, obtains for himself or another person, attempts to obtain for himself or another person, or continues to receive or enables another person to continue to receive public assistance in an amount of more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) is guilty of a Class I felony.

As used in this section the word “person” means person, association, consortium, corporation, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity, or organization.

History.

1937, c. 288, ss. 27, 57; 1963, cc. 1013, 1024, 1062; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1977, c. 604, s. 1; 1979, c. 510, s. 2; c. 907; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 813; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 108A-39.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 12.14.

§ 108A-39.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 966, s. 3.